Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.150

Out-of-district residence not to affect enrollment for state resident.

Any resident of the state may enroll in any program or course maintained or conducted by a college district upon the same terms and conditions regardless of the district of his or her residence.

[ 1991 c 238 s 43; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.150. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 15. Formerly RCW 28.85.150.]